Tennessee, session 114, HB0604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-4-201(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "shall make application to the commission in duplicate" in the first sentence of the
subdivision and substituting "shall make application to the commission in triplicate".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0604
002562
- 1 -